Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Chapter 15. North Bennington Graded School District

§ 15-1.
Establishment of District.

All of the Town of Bennington which is included within the limits of the incorporated Village of North Bennington is hereby constituted a school district in the Town by the name of the North Bennington Graded School District and the Graded School District
shall have all the powers and privileges and shall be subject to all the duties and liabilities that are incident to school districts as established under the laws of this State.

§ 15-2.
Prudential Committee.

The Prudential Committee shall consist of five persons, and at the annual meeting of the District, vacancies occasioned by the expiration of the term of office of members of the Committee shall be filled by the election of members for the term of three
years each; and all vacancies on the Committee caused by resignation, death, removal from the District, or other cause shall be filled at an annual or special meeting warned for that purpose for the unexpired term of such members only.

§ 15-3.
Authority to make rules and establish schools.

The Graded School District may make bylaws, rules, and regulations as it may deem expedient, not inconsistent with the laws of this State, and may provide for the establishment and maintenance of such number of schools and of such grade or grades and
for teaching therein such branches of knowledge as it may deem expedient.

§ 15-4.
Distribution of public funds.

In the distribution of public moneys, that portion which may be divided among the several districts, irrespective of the number of scholars or their attendance at school, shall be so divided as to give the Graded School District the shares of the several
original districts of which it is or shall be composed.

§ 15-5.
Additional districts.

If any other school district or districts in the Town of Bennington or in the adjoining Town of Shaftsbury shall at any time, by their vote at a meeting duly warned for that purpose, signify their desire to become united with the Graded School District,
and if the Graded School District at a meeting duly warned for that purpose shall vote to agree to the union, the additional District shall to all intents and purposes become and form a part of the North Bennington Graded School District,
and the union of the districts may be made upon the terms in regard to the school property of each as may be mutually agreed upon by the districts.